Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 3. Adjudication
§ 41-4-322.
Surplus water; limitations on use.

Each applicant shall be entitled to divert for beneficial use such quantity of surplus water as he can so use, not in excess of one (1) cubic foot of water per second of time for each seventy (70) acres of land irrigated therewith, and not in excess of an amount which equals his proportionate share of the total quantity of previously appropriated water from said stream.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 153, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 71-221; W.S. 1957, § 41-186.

Plaintiff not injured by statute. —

It was impossible for plaintiff's post-March 1, 1945 water right to be injured by the Wyoming Surplus Water Law because he never obtained any right greater than the one authorized by the statute. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Thus, no standing to challenge constitutionality. —

Since plaintiff could not attack the constitutionality of the Wyoming Surplus Water Law, ch. 153, Laws 1945, on the ground of injury to rights of others, and there was no injury to plaintiff's post-March 1, 1945, rights, since only prior appropriators, not subsequent ones, could be injured by the statute, plaintiff did not have standing to challenge the constitutionality of the statute. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

The purpose and effect

of the Wyoming Surplus Water Law, ch. 153, Laws 1945, was to define, limit and clearly provide for the vesting of the right to use the excess water by the several appropriators. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Interpretation applied to Wyoming Surplus Water Law statutory provisions by state officers. —

See Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Vesting of water rights. —

Water rights are real property rights which become vested as of the time the application for appropriation is filed, if the right is adjudicated. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Rights subject to those of prior appropriators. —

Pursuant to art. 8, § 2, Wyo. Const., and the statutes adopted by the Wyoming legislature, water rights are perfected by the filing of an application for a water permit which then is adjudicated to the applicant by the board of control after the board has determined that the applicant does have such a right by beneficial use. The right of a citizen of Wyoming to appropriate water for purposes of irrigation is defined and limited by these statutes. Each appropriator, in turn, takes his right subject to the right of any prior appropriators from the stream. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Rights limited to beneficial use. —

The water right of any appropriator is limited to beneficial use, and, even though a larger amount of water has been adjudicated, the water right is subject to reduction if not applied for beneficial purposes. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

§ 41-4-323.
Surplus water; senior priority.

When anyone has applied surplus water to beneficial use, as herein provided, he shall be entitled thereafter to divert and beneficially use his proportionate share thereof, and such diversion and beneficial use, when accomplished, is hereby declared to be an appropriation of such water, entitled to a priority senior to any water right acquired after March 1, 1945.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 153, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 71-222; W.S. 1957, § 41-187.

Plaintiff not injured by statute. —

It was impossible for plaintiff's post-March 1, 1945 water right to be injured by the Wyoming Surplus Water Law because he never obtained any right greater than the one authorized by the statute. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Thus, no standing to challenge constitutionality. —

Since plaintiff could not attack the constitutionality of the Wyoming Surplus Water Law, ch. 153, Laws 1945, on the ground of injury to rights of others, and there was no injury to plaintiff's post-March 1, 1945, rights, since only prior appropriators, not subsequent ones, could be injured by the statute, plaintiff did not have standing to challenge the constitutionality of the statute. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

The purpose and effect

of the Wyoming Surplus Water Law, ch. 153, Laws 1945, was to define, limit and clearly provide for the vesting of the right to use the excess water by the several appropriators. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Interpretation applied to Wyoming Surplus Water Law statutory provisions by state officers. —

See Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Vesting of water rights. —

Water rights are real property rights which become vested as of the time the application for appropriation is filed, if the right is adjudicated. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Rights subject to those of prior appropriators. —

Pursuant to art. 8, § 2, Wyo. Const., and the statutes adopted by the Wyoming legislature, water rights are perfected by the filing of an application for a water permit which then is adjudicated to the applicant by the board of control after the board has determined that the applicant does have such a right by beneficial use. The right of a citizen of Wyoming to appropriate water for purposes of irrigation is defined and limited by these statutes. Each appropriator, in turn, takes his right subject to the right of any prior appropriators from the stream. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

And limited to beneficial use. —

The water right of any appropriator is limited to beneficial use, and, even though a larger amount of water has been adjudicated, the water right is subject to reduction if not applied for beneficial purposes. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

§ 41-4-324.
Surplus water; construction of W.S. 41-4-317 through 41-4-324.

Nothing in this act [§§

41-4-317

through

41-4-324

] shall be so construed as to permit, authorize or make lawful the diversion or taking of any water other than surplus water as herein defined.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 153, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 71-223; W.S. 1957, § 41-188.

Plaintiff not injured by statute. —

It was impossible for plaintiff's post-March 1, 1945 water right to be injured by the Wyoming Surplus Water Law because he never obtained any right greater than the one authorized by the statute. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Thus, no standing to challenge constitutionality. —

Since plaintiff could not attack the constitutionality of the Wyoming Surplus Water Law, ch. 153, Laws 1945, on the ground of injury to rights of others, and there was no injury to plaintiff's post-March 1, 1945, rights, since only prior appropriators, not subsequent ones, could be injured by the statute, plaintiff did not have standing to challenge the constitutionality of the statute. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

The purpose and effect

of the Wyoming Surplus Water Law, ch. 153, Laws 1945, was to define, limit and clearly provide for the vesting of the right to use the excess water by the several appropriators. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Interpretation applied to Wyoming Surplus Water Law statutory provisions by state officers. —

See Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Vesting of water rights. —

Water rights are real property rights which become vested as of the time the application for appropriation is filed, if the right is adjudicated. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Rights subject to those of prior appropriators. —

Pursuant to art. 8, § 2, Wyo. Const., and the statutes adopted by the Wyoming legislature, water rights are perfected by the filing of an application for a water permit which then is adjudicated to the applicant by the board of control after the board has determined that the applicant does have such a right by beneficial use. The right of a citizen of Wyoming to appropriate water for purposes of irrigation is defined and limited by these statutes. Each appropriator, in turn, takes his right subject to the right of any prior appropriators from the stream. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Rights limited to beneficial use. —

The water right of any appropriator is limited to beneficial use, and, even though a larger amount of water has been adjudicated, the water right is subject to reduction if not applied for beneficial purposes. Budd v. Bishop, 543 P.2d 368,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1975).

Surplus Water Law cannot bestow junior appropriator status upon base right senior appropriator. —

Since a 1945 surplus water appropriation may not be abandoned for nonuse without abandoning the water right upon which it depends and to which it is attached, and since this section prohibits use of the surplus water provisions to attack base rights, the Surplus Water Law (§§

41-4-317

to

41-4-324

) may not be used for the purpose of bestowing junior appropriator standing upon a base right senior appropriator so that such senior appropriator may establish that he is “affected” within the purview of the abandonment statute (§

41-3-401

). Cremer v. State Bd. of Control, 675 P.2d 250,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 241

(Wyo. 1984).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Disparity Between State Water Rights Records and Actual Water Use Patterns,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 23 (1970).

§ 41-4-325.
Contents of certificate of priority; recording; fees; transmittal of appropriation; fees for proofs submitted at hearings; disposition.

As soon as practicable after the determination of the priorities of appropriation of the use of waters of any stream, it shall be the duty of the secretary to issue to each person, association or corporation represented in the determination a certificate to be signed by the president of the board of control, and attested under seal, setting forth the names and post office address of the appropriator; the priority date and number of the appropriation; the amount of water appropriated; and if the appropriation is for irrigation, a description of the legal subdivisions of land to which the water is to be applied. Certificates shall be transmitted to the county clerk of the county in which the appropriation shall have been made, and it shall be the duty of the county clerk upon receipt of the recording fee required by W.S.

18-3-402

to record the same in a book especially prepared and kept for that purpose, and thereupon immediately transmit the same to the respective appropriators. At the time of the submission of testimony to the division superintendent he shall collect for each proof taken a fee not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) which fee shall be transmitted to the secretary of the board of control together with the testimony and proofs of appropriation. The county recording fee shall be used as above provided and the remainder shall be credited to the general fund.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 8, § 26; 1895, ch. 62, § 6; 1899, ch. 79, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 873; Laws 1907, ch. 86, § 11; C.S. 1910, § 778; C.S. 1920, § 899; R.S. 1931, § 122-118; Laws 1937, ch. 99, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-224; W.S. 1957, § 41-189; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1979, ch. 56, § 1; 1993, ch. 123, § 1.

General rules concerning necessary or proper parties apply. —

While this section speaks of the issuance of certificates of appropriation to each person “represented in such determination,” no fixed standards concerning necessary or proper parties are actually set forth and under such circumstances, general rules are usually applicable. Anita Ditch Co. v. Turner, 389 P.2d 1018,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1964).

Adjudications presumed correct. —

The adjudications of the board are prima facie evidence of the correctness thereof on persons not parties to the proceedings. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Adjudications by the board of control were presumed to be correct and prima facie evidence thereof even on those who were not parties to the proceedings. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Legislature has no power to make adjudications by the board of control binding upon persons who were not parties to the proceedings.

Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Where board adjudicated priorities on a stream and tributary in separate proceedings, with appropriators on one stream who were not parties to the action respecting the other, it was held that the adjudications were sufficient to give power to water commissioner to divide the water between the streams, though the proceedings were not binding on those not parties. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

Where board adjudicated waters between two streams in separate proceedings, water commission had authority to divide the water between the two streams though the proceedings were not binding on persons on one stream who were not parties to the adjudication proceedings. Laramie Irrigation & Power Co. v. Grant, 44 Wyo. 392, 13 P.2d 235,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1932).

No presumption of equal shares of water to each piece of land. —

In absence of claims or proofs by landowners, decree adjudicating company's right to two appropriations of stated number of cubic feet of water per second from river for irrigation of specified acreage of land did not adjudicate equal proportionate shares of water to each piece of land designated. State v. Laramie Rivers Co., 59 Wyo. 9, 136 P.2d 487,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1943).

Granting of permit determines priority. —

After a permit had been granted to a defendant's assignors to construct a ditch, plaintiff filed an application, which was not approved and in an action by plaintiff to enjoin the construction of defendant's ditch, plaintiff offered evidence to show a survey of his ditch and its partial construction the year before but such evidence was inadmissible to show priority of water right as no right could have been gained until a permit had been granted. Whalon v. North Platte Canal & Colonization Co., 11 Wyo. 313, 71 P. 995,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1903).

Right to assert claim of priority in court. —

Where defendant acquired right of appropriation of certain water before adoption of constitution, the fact that he failed to present his claim of priority to the board of control, after notice of proceedings to establish such claims, will not estop him from asserting his right in district court, since proceedings of the board awarding priorities to others were not necessarily adverse to his claim, and hence not res judicata of his rights. Farm Inv. Co. v. Carpenter, 9 Wyo. 110, 61 P. 258,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1900).

Cited

in

Johnston v. Little Horse Creek Irrigating Co., 13 Wyo. 208, 79 P. 22,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 39

, 70 L.R.A. 341 (1904).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Record Title of Water and Ditch Rights,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 200 (1957).

§ 41-4-326.
Conclusiveness of final decrees of board.

The final orders or decrees of the state board of control, in the proceedings provided by law for the adjudication and determination of rights to the use of the public waters of the state, shall be conclusive as to all prior appropriations, and the rights of all existing claimants upon the stream or other body of water lawfully embraced in the adjudication, subject, however, to the provisions of law for rehearings in such proceedings and for the reopening of the orders or decrees therein and for appeals from such orders or decrees.

History.

Laws 1901, ch. 67, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 793; C.S. 1920, § 914; R.S. 1931, § 122-135; C.S. 1945, § 71-258; W.S. 1957, § 41-190.

Presumption of jurisdiction. —

Where recital appears in water right adjudication decree, by state board of control, that due notice had been given to interested parties, presumption will be indulged in favor of such inferior tribunal as obtains with respect of courts of general jurisdiction, to show jurisdiction of parties. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

No prescriptive rights to water. —

Since 1890 when water rights were required to be initiated by permit from the state engineer, it is settled that prescriptive right to state waters cannot obtain. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

All parties are bound by the adjudication.

Hamp v. State, 19 Wyo. 377, 118 P. 653,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1911).

Pleading rules. —

In an action not involving an ordinary adjudication between one or more parties, on the one hand, and one or more parties, on the other, the rules of pleading to ordinary extent cannot apply. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Collateral attack. —

An order for appropriation of water cannot be collaterally attacked by a stranger to the proceedings, for fraud in submission of proof. May v. Penton, 45 Wyo. 82, 16 P.2d 35,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1932).

Showing of interest necessary to attack another's right. —

Before a party may attack right of another, either on constitutional or other grounds, he must show an interest which is affected, or a right invaded, which cannot obtain where plaintiff enjoys a decreed water right which cannot be enlarged. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Interest cannot be based on subsequently acquired rights. —

One who had no rights at the time an order is entered cannot complain on the ground of subsequently acquired rights. May v. Penton, 45 Wyo. 82, 16 P.2d 35,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1932).

Estoppel from claiming greater rights. —

Section

41-4-310

estops water users under decrees of state board of control from claiming any other or greater rights than thereunder, hence in a suit to obtain enlarged rights not only the testimony offered, but that admitted, in support of the petition, was immaterial and had no tendency to establish any rights in the plaintiff. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Admission of photostats. —

Photostatic copies of pen and ink records of decrees in the board of control, showing nothing more suspicious than interlineations, interlineations will not prevent their admission as evidence, when properly certified, especially as they are what is called ancient documents. Campbell v. Wyoming Dev. Co., 55 Wyo. 347, 100 P.2d 124,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 55 Wyo. 347, 102 P.2d 745,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1940).

Applied

in

Big Goose & Beaver Ditch Co. v. Wallop, 382 P.2d 388,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1963).

Quoted

in

Petition for Change in Use & for Change in Place of Use for Ekxtrom No. 1 Well, etc. v. State Bd. of Control, 649 P.2d 657,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 365

(Wyo. 1982).

Law reviews. —

For case note on Kearney Lake, Land & Reservoir Co. v. Lake DeSmet Reservoir Co., 487 P.2d 324,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1971), see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 599 (1972).

§ 41-4-327.
Rehearing after final order of board.

After any final order of the board of control adjudicating the priorities upon any stream, any party interested therein may within one (1) year thereafter apply for a rehearing for reasons to be stated in the application; and upon the filing of such application, the secretary of the board shall mail written notice thereof to every other party interested, and therein fixing and stating a time when said application will be heard.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 62, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 883; C.S. 1910, § 788; C.S. 1920, § 909; R.S. 1931, § 122-128; C.S. 1945, § 71-233; W.S. 1957, § 41-191.

Applied

in

John Meier & Son v. Horse Creek Conservation Dist., 603 P.2d 1283,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 492

(Wyo. 1979).

§ 41-4-328.
Authority to modify order and correct testimony.

Upon such hearing the board shall have authority to modify or alter the original order in such respect as shall appear just and proper. But it shall not be necessary for an application for rehearing to be filed to entitle any party to an appeal. Upon such hearing the board shall also have authority to permit, upon good cause shown, the correction of the testimony of any party or witness, if it shall appear that a mistake has occurred therein, but no other new evidence shall be received at such hearing unless it shall be shown to the satisfaction of the board that the same is material, and has been discovered since the taking of the original testimony and could not with reasonable diligence have been discovered before that time.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 62, § 9; R.S. 1899, § 884; C.S. 1910, § 789; C.S. 1920, § 910; R.S. 1931, § 122-129; C.S. 1945, § 71-234; W.S. 1957, § 41-192.

§ 41-4-329.
Excess water; defined.

For the purpose of this act [§§

41-4-329

through

41-4-331

], excess water is hereby defined to be that quantity of water belonging to the state of Wyoming flowing in the natural channel of any main stream or a tributary of a main stream within the boundaries of Wyoming, at any time in excess of the total amount required to furnish to all existing appropriations from the stream system the maximum amount of water to which all appropriations are entitled, whether by permit or by adjudicated decree as of March 1, 1985.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 176, § 1.

§ 41-4-330.
Excess water; rights of use generally.

A right to the use of excess water as defined by W.S.

41-4-329

in the amount of one (1) cubic foot per second for each seventy (70) acres of land having an adjudicated water right or a water right under permit, except those having a priority date prior to March 2, 1945, is hereby adjudicated to attach to all original direct flow water rights, and only on lands described in adjudicated appropriations of record in the office of the state board of control or under valid permits or filings of record in the office of the state engineer. The rights so adjudicated shall bear date of priority as of March 1, 1985. Rights unadjudicated shall acquire the excess right as the original is perfected.

Any permits issued or water rights granted in the state of Wyoming with a priority date after March 1, 1985, shall be subject to the adjudication of excess water as provided herein.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 176, § 1.

§ 41-4-331.
Excess water; senior priority.

When anyone has applied excess water to beneficial use, as herein provided, he shall be entitled thereafter to divert and beneficially use his proportionate share thereof, and the diversion and beneficial use, when accomplished, is hereby declared to be an appropriation of the water, entitled to a priority senior to any water right acquired after March 1, 1985. The provisions of W.S.

41-4-321

through

41-4-324

shall apply to excess water in the same manner as it does to surplus water, except that excess water shall, pursuant to W.S.

41-4-323

, have a priority date of March 1, 1985. The term “surplus” in W.S.

41-4-324

shall apply to excess water under this act [§§

41-4-329

through

41-4-331

].

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 176, § 1.